Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-3721
Commission; contracts authorized.

All contracts awarded by the commission shall be subject to sections 73-501 to 73-510. The commission shall comply with the rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines established by the Department of Administrative Services for contracts.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 15;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1259;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 21;

Laws 2017, LB222, § 10.